test/src/morphology/comp-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - barggogæhttjesiebrre: # MUORRA
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebrre
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebre
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: barggogæhttjesæbrráj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesæbrásj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesæbrátjasj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebredibme
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: barggogæhttjesiebredak

  Noun - barggogæhttjesiebrre: # MUORRA
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebrre
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebre
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: barggogæhttjesæbrráj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesæbrásj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesæbrátjasj
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjesiebredibme
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: barggogæhttjesiebredak

  Noun - barggogæhttjijsiebrre: # MUORRA
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjijsiebrre
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: barggogæhttjijsiebre
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: barggogæhttjijsæbrráj
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjijsæbrásj
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjijsæbrátjasj
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: barggogæhttjijsiebredibme
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    barggogæhttje+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: barggogæhttjijsiebredak

  Noun - juhkkesiebrre: # MUORRA
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkesiebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkesæbrráj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrásj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrátjasj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: juhkkesiebredak

  Noun - juhkkesiebrre: # MUORRA
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkesiebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkesæbrráj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrásj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrátjasj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: juhkkesiebredak

  Noun - juhkkesiebrre: # MUORRA
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesiebrre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkesiebre
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkesæbrráj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrásj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkesæbrátjasj
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkeesiebredibme
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#siebrre+N+Abe: juhkkesiebredak

  Noun - tjásjrámát: # GAHPER
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámát
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: tjásjrámáda
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjásjrámádin
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádaj
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádattasj
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjásjrámádahtes
    tjásj+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gåtrámát: # GAHPER
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámát
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Pl+Nom: gåtrámáda
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: gåtrámádij
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádasj
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádattjasj
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gåtrámádahtes
    gåt+N+Cmp#rámát+N+Abe: []

  Noun - bassengbasse : # MUORRA
    basseng+N+Cmp#basse+N+Sg+Nom: bassengbasse 
    basseng+N+Cmp#basse+N+Sg+Ine: bassengbassen
    basseng+N+Cmp#basse+N+Sg+Ill: bassengbassáj

  Noun - budsjettdiedádus: # GÅNÅGIS
    budsjæhtta+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Nom: budsjettdiedádus
    budsjæhtta+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ine: budsjettdiedádusán
    budsjæhtta+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ill: budsjettdiedádussaj

  Noun - tjáppisgiedjek: # GAHPER
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjek 
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Gen: tjáhppisgiedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Acc: tjáhppisgiedjegav
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ine: tjáhppisgiedjegin
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ill: tjáhppisgiedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ela: tjáhppisgiedjegis
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Com: tjáhppisgiedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Gen: tjáhppisgiedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Acc: tjáhppisgiedjegijt
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ine: tjáhppisgiedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ill: tjáhppisgiedjegijda
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ela: tjáhppisgiedjegijs
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Com: tjáhppisgiedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Ess: tjáhppisgiedjegin
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegasj
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegattjasj
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegahtá
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Abe: []

  Noun - tjehpudakmihtto : # MUORRA
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudakmihtto 
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudakmihton
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudakmihttuj

  Noun - tjehpudakmihtto : # MUORRA
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudakmihtto 
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudakmihton
    tjehpudahka+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudakmihttuj

  Noun - viedtjamulmusj : # 
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: viedtjamulmusj
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: viedtjamulmutjin
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: viedtjamulmutjij

  Noun - uksagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: uksagiehtje
    uksa+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: uksagietjen
    uksa+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: uksagæhtjáj

  Noun - uvsagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: uvsagiehtje
    uksa+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: uvsagietjen
    uksa+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: uvsagæhtjáj

  Noun - uvsajgiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: uvsajgiehtje
    uksa+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: uvsajgietjen
    uksa+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: uvsajgæhtjáj

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbbedille
    nijbbe+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbbedilen
    nijbbe+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbbedilláj

  Noun - nijbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbedille
    nijbbe+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbedilen
    nijbbe+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbedilláj

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbijdille
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbijdilen
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbijdilláj

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbijdille
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbijdilen
    nijbbe+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbijdilláj
